Nebraska, session 109, LB292.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB292 LB292
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-1239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1239 (1) The Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund is
created. Funding for the grant program described in section 81-1238 shall
come from the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund. The Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund may include revenue transferred
at the direction of from appropriations from the Legislature, grants,
private contributions, and other sources. Any money in the Middle Income
Workforce Housing Investment Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The department shall establish a subaccount within the Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund that shall be used to fund
affordable housing and related land parcel preparation activities under
the Economic Recovery Act as described in subdivisions (4)(d) and (e) of
section 81-12,241.
(3) The department shall administer the Middle Income Workforce
Housing Investment Fund and may seek additional private or nonstate funds
to use in the grant program under the Middle Income Workforce Housing
Investment Act, including, but not limited to, contributions from the
Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and other interested parties.
(4) Interest earned by the department on grant funds shall be
applied to the grant program.
(5) If a nonprofit development organization, or a recipient of
subaccount funds described in subsection (2) of this section, fails to
engage in a qualified activity within twenty-four months after receiving
initial grant funding, the nonprofit development organization or
recipient of subaccount funds shall return the grant proceeds to the
department for credit to the General Fund.
(6) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five hundred
thousand dollars from the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund
-2-

LB292 LB292
2025 2025
to the Department of Economic Development for purposes of the grant in
section 2 of this act.
(7) (6) Beginning July 1, 2029, any funds held by the department in
the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund shall be transferred
to the General Fund.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section, prefabricated housing
includes a manufactured home as defined in section 23-114 and any other
housing constructed using sections or components that are manufactured
offsite in a factory setting.
(2) The Department of Economic Development shall award a grant to a
qualified applicant to conduct a study regarding prefabricated housing in
Nebraska.
(3) In order to qualify for the grant, an applicant shall
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the applicant has:
(a) Demonstrated capacity as shown by adequate personnel with
expertise in areas relevant to the study, such as housing policy, zoning
regulations, infrastructure, or prefabricated housing technology, and by
access to technological resources necessary to conduct the study, such as
data analysis tools or simulation models;
(b) Commitment to deliverables as shown by an agreement to provide a
comprehensive presentation and an electronic report to the department by
April 1, 2026;
(c) Expertise and experience as shown by a proven track record in
conducting similar studies or projects related to housing, urban
development, or economic studies; and
(d) Stakeholder engagement capability as shown by the ability to
collaborate with municipalities, counties, manufacturers, and utility
providers to gather data and insights for the study.
(4) The study shall include:
(a) Zoning regulations that impact the location of prefabricated
housing in various sizes of municipalities and counties;
-3-

LB292 LB292
2025 2025
(b) State and local regulation of the manufacturing and use of
prefabricated housing;
(c) The infrastructure necessary and available for prefabricated
housing in various sizes of municipalities and counties;
(d) The utilities necessary and available for prefabricated housing
sites in various sizes of municipalities and counties;
(e) The capital necessary and available for manufacturing
prefabricated housing, site selection for prefabricated housing, and use
of prefabricated housing by homeowners;
(f) The current availability of prefabricated housing and housing
units in various sizes of municipalities and counties;
(g) The interested population groups for the purchase or lease of
prefabricated housing; and
(h) Incentives for buyers, renters, manufacturers, and developers of
prefabricated housing.
Sec. 3. Original section 81-1239, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-